Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5293.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly makes the following findings of fact:
(1) Rhode Island is facing significant environmental challenges as the state’s only landfill
will reach its capacity by 2046;
(2) The people of Rhode Island must work together to keep unwanted textiles out of the
landfill and improve recycling practices;
(3) Clean, segregated textiles are the most common post-consumer materials to be reused
for their original purpose, or upcycled into numerous other usable products;
(4) The most recent data shows that an estimated twenty-eight thousand eight hundred sixty
(28,860) tons of textiles from residential, industrial and commercial institutions were delivered to
Rhode Island resource recovery corporation landfill; and
(5) While textiles are currently required to be recycled, the state must increase public
awareness and expand textile recycling to ensure that the least number of textiles unnecessarily end
up in our landfill.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 18.19
TEXTILE RECYCLING
23-18.19-1. Definition.
As used in this chapter:

(1) “Corporation” means the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation;
(2) “Department” means the department of environmental management;
(3) “Private entities” means any entity, including for-profit and nonprofit organizations,
involved in the collection of textiles for recycle or reuse purposes, in accordance with the
department’s rules and regulations.
(4) “Textiles” means clothing, footwear, bedding, towels, curtains, fabric, and similar
products, except textiles that are contaminated with mold, bodily fluids, insects, oil, or hazardous
substances.
23-18.19-2. Textile waste education.
The department shall, in collaboration with the corporation, create a public education
outreach program to educate residential households and commercial businesses on the value of,
and proper methods to, recycle textiles in the state. The department and the corporation shall create
an online directory, and may create a recycling assistance program, to help guide residents,
businesses, and municipalities to reduce their textile waste.
23-18.19-3. Textile collection and reporting requirements.
(a) Beginning January 1, 2028, all private entities involved in textile collection, shall
provide to the department, an annual reporting on the estimated total tonnage of textiles collected.
The department shall include this data along with municipal textile data in any reports generated.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2029, the department may use this data to establish benchmark
goals for the tonnage of municipal and commercial textiles collected, which may be increased
annually at the discretion of the department, pursuant to § 23-18.19-4.
23-18.19-4. Regulatory authority and enforcement.
The department shall commence collecting data pursuant to § 23-18.19-3, and shall be
responsible for formulating and promulgating rules and regulations related to textile waste
collection and recycling. The department shall report these regulations to the secretary of state to
be made available to the public by June 1, 2026. The department may enforce these regulations and
may levy any fines or penalties established by the department.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001127
========
LC001127 - Page 2 of 3